Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Article 3. Energy Management Law of 1981.

§ 57-39-101.
Short title.

Sections 57-39-101 through 57-39-115 may be cited as the “Mississippi Energy Management Law.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 420, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1983, ch. 540, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 593, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 57-39-103.
Purpose.

The purpose of Sections 57-39-103 through 57-39-115 is to provide for development and implementation of a state energy management plan for all state-owned or state-leased buildings and facilities which will minimize energy consumption and insure that buildings and facilities are operated with maximum efficiency of energy use.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 420, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1983, ch. 540, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 593, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§§ 57-39-105 and 57-39-107.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2013, ch. 538, §§ 19 and 20, effective from and after July 1, 2013.

§57-39-105. [Laws, 1981, ch. 420, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1983, ch. 540, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 244; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 44; Laws, 1998, ch. 593, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§57-39-107. [Laws, 1981, ch. 420, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1983, ch. 540, § 4; Laws, 1998, ch. 593, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§ 57-39-109.
Agency and public school district coordinators.

Any agency or institution designated by the division and funded in whole or in part by public funds shall appoint a coordinator from existing staff who shall advise the agency head or institution head on energy-related matters. The coordinator shall confer and cooperate with the board in developing, implementing and evaluating an energy management plan for the agency or institution. Any public school district may appoint a coordinator from its existing staff.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 420, § 5; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1983, ch. 540, § 5; Laws, 1998, ch. 593, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 57-39-111.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2013, ch. 538, § 21, effective from and after July 1, 2013.

§57-39-111. [Laws, 1981, ch. 420, § 6; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1983, ch. 540, § 6; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 245; Laws, 1998, ch. 593, § 8; Laws, 2010, ch. 514, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.]

§ 57-39-112.
Assisting school districts in reducing energy consumption.

The division shallprovide technical assistance to the Mississippi Department of Education so that the department can assist local school districts in developing a detailed energy management plan for that public school district. The purposes of the plan shall be to assist the public school district in reducing consumption of energy in its buildings and facilities and to maintain or reduce that level of energy consumption, subject to any allowances for building and facilities modernization, remodeling or upgrading for educational purposes, and for increased or decreased enrollment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1983, ch. 540, § 7; Laws, 1998, ch. 593, § 9; Laws, 2013, ch. 538, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§§ 57-39-113 and 57-39-115.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2013, ch. 538, §§ 22 and 23, effective from and after July 1, 2013.

§57-39-113. [Laws, 1981, ch. 420, § 7; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1983, ch. 540, § 8; Laws, 1998, ch. 593, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]

§57-39-115. [Laws, 1981, ch. 420, § 8; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1983, ch. 540, § 9; Laws, 1998, ch. 593, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1998.]